Vermont, session 2025-2026, S107.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4255 is amended to read:
§ 4255. LICENSE FEES
* * *
(n)(1) When the General Assembly enacts law on or after July 1, 2025
requiring the issuance of a free hunting, fishing, trapping, combination, or
lifetime license under subsection (c) of this section, the Vermont Department
of Fish and Wildlife shall be reimbursed for the fee revenue lost in an amount
VT LEG #380058 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.107
2025 Page 2 of 2
equal to the revenue that would have been received if the full fee had been paid
to the Department for each free license issued.
(2) The Commissioner shall maintain an accounting of lost revenue due
to the issuance of free licenses that require reimbursement under subdivision
(1) of this subsection. The Commissioner annually on or before January 15
shall submit to the Department of Finance and Management the accounting of
lost revenue from the previous calendar year due to the issuance of free
licenses. Within 60 days of submission to the Department of Finance and
Management of the accounting of lost revenue under this subsection, the
Commissioner of Finance and Management shall pay from the General Fund
into the Fish and Wildlife Fund the amount of revenue lost due to the issuance
of free licenses requiring reimbursement under subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380058 v.1